Massachusetts, session 194th, H3431.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the
General Laws, the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance, in consultation
with the commissioner of correction, may release by deed or other instrument for the benefit of:
(1) Thirty Eight Main Street Realty Trust, owner of the premises located at 38 Main street
in the town of Norfolk, its successors or assigns, the portion of a sewer easement located on said
real property owned by said trust;
of 5

(2) RASCO Realty Trust, owner of the premises located at 48 Seekonk street in the town
of Norfolk, its successors or assigns, the portion of a sewer easement located on said real
property owned by said trust;
(3) Everett Benton and Linda Benton, owners of the premises located at 19 King Philip
trail in the town of Norfolk, their successors or assigns, the portion of a sewer easement located
on said real property owned by said persons;
(4) K&M Property Management LLC, owner of the premises located at 17 King Philip
trail in the town of Norfolk, its successors or assigns, the portion of a sewer easement located on
said real property owned by said K&M Property Management LLC;
(5) John Knox and Linda Knox, owners of the premises located at 15 King Philip trail in
the town of Norfolk, their successors or assigns, the portion of a sewer easement located on said
real property owned by said persons;
(6) Louise D. Rachin Revocable Trust, owner of the premises located at 11 King Philip
trail in the town of Norfolk, its successors or assigns, the portion of a sewer easement located on
said real property owned by said trust;
(7) James Ricciardi and Mary Ricciardi, owners of the premises located at 9 King Philip
trail in the town of Norfolk, their successors or assigns, the portion of a sewer easement located
on said real property owned by said persons;
(8) Richard Schmidt and Susan Schmidt, owners of the premises located at 7 ½ King
Philip trail in the town of Norfolk, their successors or assigns, the portion of a sewer easement
located on said real property owned by said persons;
of 5

(9) Ellen Cargill, owner of the premises located at 7 King Philip trail in the town of
Norfolk, their successors or assigns, the portion of a sewer easement located on said real
property owned by said person;
(10) Paul Roach and Kevin Roach, owners of a premises located on Campbell street in
the town of Norfolk, more particularly described in a deed recorded with the Norfolk county
registry of deeds in book 17892, page 392, their successors or assigns, the portion of a sewer
easement located on said real property owned by said persons;
(11) Bonnie G.C. McLaughlin and Robin Haeuser, owners of the premises located at 23
Campbell street in the town of Norfolk, their successors or assigns, the portion of a sewer
easement located on said real property owned by said persons;
(12) Matthew Awad, owner of the premises located at 31 Campbell street in the town of
Norfolk, their successors or assigns, the portion of a sewer easement located on said real
property owned by said person;
(13) The town of Norfolk, owner of the premises located at 22 Campbell street and on
King Philip trail in said town of Norfolk, more particularly described in a deed recorded with the
Norfolk county registry of deeds in book 30128, page 584 and book 25488, page 308, the portion
of a sewer easement located on said real property owned by said town; and
(14) NextGrid Patriots LLC, owner of the premises located on Lincoln road in the town
of Norfolk, more particularly described in a deed recorded with the Norfolk county registry of
deeds in book 37855, page 256, its successors or assigns, the portion of a sewer easement located
on said real property owned by said NextGrid Patriots LLC.
of 5

The easement was taken by the department of correction for sewage disposal purposes in
an order of taking dated October 29, 1930, recorded with the Norfolk county registry of deeds in
book 1912, page 63. The easement is shown on a plan titled, “Commonwealth of Massachusetts,
Department of Correction, State Prison Colony, Norfolk, Mass., Sewer Right of Way” prepared
by Bayard F. Snow, dated October 29, 1930, which is on file with the Norfolk registry of deeds
in plan book 112, pages 813 and 814. The exact boundaries of the easement to be released to
each owner named in this section shall be determined by the division of capital asset
management and maintenance, in consultation with the department of correction, based upon a
survey.
SECTION 2. The release of the portion of the easement described in section 1 shall be in
accordance with such terms and conditions as the commissioner of capital asset management and
maintenance, in consultation with the commissioner of correction, shall prescribe.
SECTION 3. The consideration for the release of the easement pursuant to this act shall
be the full and fair market value as determined by the commissioner of capital asset management
and maintenance based on an independent professional appraisal. The commissioner shall submit
the appraisal to the inspector general for review and comment. The inspector general shall
review such appraisal, including, but not limited to, an examination of the methodology utilized
for the appraisal. The inspector general shall prepare a report of such review and file the report
with the commissioner. The commissioner shall submit copies of the appraisal and the inspector
general’s report and approval and comments, if any, to the house and senate committees on ways
and means and the joint committee on state administration and regulatory oversight prior to the
execution of documents affecting the release of the easement authorized by this act.
of 5

SECTION 4. The owners of the land named in section 1 shall benefit from the release of
the easement pursuant to this act and shall be responsible for any costs for surveys, appraisals,
recording fees and other expenses relating to the release of the easement.
of 5